Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 10 COLORADO OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP INITIATIVE
23-3.3-1009. Support for in-demand short-term health-care credentials - report - definitions - repeal.

Subject to available appropriations, the state board for community colleges and occupational education, in coordination with its career and technical education role and mission as Colorado's state administrator of the federal "Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education Improvement Act of 1998", 20 U.S.C. sec. 2301 et seq., as amended, shall administer the in-demand short-term health-care credentials program or care forward Colorado, referred to in this section as the "program", in order to support the expansion of available health-care professionals.

The state board for community colleges and occupational education shall allocate money to community colleges, area technical colleges, local district colleges, and community not-for-profit organizations that deliver hybrid programming that leverages place-based supports in partnership with local district colleges, community colleges, and area technical colleges through reimbursement based on students enrolled in eligible programs for fiscal years 2022-23 to 2025-26 to:

Provide assistance for tuition, fees, and course materials for eligible programs;

Support alignment with existing efforts, such as apprenticeship and work-based learning, for students to earn eligible program credentials that lead into health-care careers such as nursing; and

If unexpended resources exist or if the program use is less than anticipated, to expand eligible programs in allied health based on in-demand credential needs or include high school equivalency support and attainment for students without a high school degree who participate in the program.

In allocating the money pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the first priority is for students enrolled in eligible allied health programs with nursing aide programs and the second priority is for students enrolled in an emergency medical technician program.

The program begins no later than the 2022-23 academic year.

Depending on the credential pathway, students participating in the program must complete a free application for federal student aid or Colorado application for the college opportunity fund and state financial aid and submit an application for the college opportunity scholarship initiative fund. Subject to available appropriations, the program resources must cover remaining tuition, fees, books, and material costs.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "eligible programs" means in-demand credentials in allied health care less than one year in duration through career and technical education programs, including certified nursing assistant, emergency medical technician, phlebotomy technician, pharmacy technician, medical assistant, and dental assistant.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate to the department for allocation by the board twenty-six million dollars from the economic recovery and relief cash fund created in section 24-75-228 for the eligible programs, of which twenty-five thousand dollars may be used for purposes of marketing the program and one percent may be used for administration pursuant to this section. Any unexpended money remaining at the end of the 2022-23 state fiscal year from this appropriation:

Does not revert to the general fund or any other fund;

May be used by the board in the 2023-24 or 2024-25 state fiscal years without further appropriation; and

Must not be used for any other purpose other than the purposes set forth in this section.

In addition to the appropriation in this section and subject to available appropriations, the board may seek gifts, grants, and donations for the program.

Beginning January 1, 2023, the department shall include a summarized report regarding the program in the department's annual presentation to the committees of reference pursuant to section 2-7-203. Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the reporting requirement in this subsection (8) continues indefinitely.

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2027.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-226), ch. 179, p. 1189, § 5, effective May 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 22-226, see section 1 of chapter 179, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.